Utah statutes.
75-2-114.   Parent and child relationship.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), for purposes of intestate succession by, through, or from a person, an individual is the child of the individual's natural parents, regardless of their marital status.  The parent and child relationship may be established as provided in Title 78B, Chapter 15, Utah Uniform Parentage Act.

(2)  An adopted individual is the child of the adopting parent or parents and not of the natural parents, but adoption of a child by the spouse of either natural parent has no effect on:

(a)  the relationship between the child and that natural parent; or

(b)  the right of the child or a descendant of the child to inherit from or through the other natural parent.

(3)  Inheritance from or through a child by either natural parent or his kindred is precluded unless that natural parent has openly treated the child as his, and has not refused to support the child.

